Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 76A. Historic Downtown Development
§ 2793e.
Neighborhood planning areas; designation of neighborhood development areas.

Purpose. This section is intended to encourage a municipality to plan for new and infill housing in the area including and immediately encircling its designated downtown, village center, new town center, or within its designated growth center in order to provide needed housing and to further support the commercial establishments in the designated center. To support this goal, this section sets out a two-component process.

The first component is the automatic delineation of a study area, defined in this section as a neighborhood planning area, that includes and encircles a municipality’s designated downtown, village center, or new town center or, in the case of a designated growth center, is within the designated center. The process established by this section allows a municipality with a designated center to identify those locations within a neighborhood planning area that are suitable primarily for residential development.

The second component is the application by a municipality for the designation of locations within this study area as neighborhood development areas that are suitable for residential development and will receive the benefits provided by this section.

The Department shall provide municipalities with designated downtowns, village centers, new town centers, and growth centers with grants, as they become available, and technical assistance to help such municipalities apply for and receive neighborhood development area designations.

Definitions.

“Neighborhood planning area” means an automatically delineated area including and encircling a downtown, village center, or new town center designated under this chapter or within a growth center designated under this chapter. A neighborhood planning area is used for the purpose of identifying locations suitable for new and infill housing that will support a development pattern that is compact, oriented to pedestrians, and consistent with smart growth principles. To ensure a compact settlement pattern, the outer boundary of a neighborhood planning area shall be located entirely within the boundaries of the applicant municipality and shall be determined:

for a municipality with a designated downtown, by measuring out one-half mile from each point around the entire perimeter of the designated downtown boundary;

for a municipality with one or more designated village centers, by measuring out one-quarter mile from each point around the entire perimeter of the designated village center boundary;

for a municipality with a designated new town center, by measuring out one-quarter mile from each point around the entire perimeter of the designated new town center boundary; and

for a municipality with a designated growth center, as the same boundary as the designated growth center boundary.

“Neighborhood development area” means a location within a neighborhood planning area that is suitable for new and infill housing and that has been approved by the State Board for designation under this section and associated benefits.

Application for designation of a neighborhood development area. The State Board shall approve a neighborhood development area if the application demonstrates and includes all of the following elements:

The municipality has a duly adopted and approved plan and a planning process that is confirmed in accordance with section 4350 of this title and has adopted bylaws and regulations in accordance with sections 4414, 4418, and 4442 of this title.

A preapplication meeting with Department staff was held to review the program requirements and to preliminarily identify possible neighborhood development areas.

The proposed neighborhood development area is within a neighborhood planning area or such extension of the planning area as may be approved under subsection (d) of this section.

The proposed neighborhood development area consists of those portions of the neighborhood planning area that are generally within walking distance from the municipality’s downtown, village center, or new town center designated under this chapter or from locations within the municipality’s growth center designated under this chapter that are planned for higher density development.

The proposed neighborhood development area consists of those portions of the neighborhood planning area that are appropriate for new and infill housing, excluding identified flood hazard and fluvial erosion areas. In determining what areas are most suitable for new and infill housing, the municipality shall balance local goals for future land use, the availability of land for housing within the neighborhood planning area, and the smart growth principles. Based on those considerations, the municipality shall select an area for neighborhood development area designation that:

Avoids or that minimizes to the extent feasible the inclusion of “important natural resources” as defined in subdivision 2791(14) of this title. If an “important natural resource” is included within a proposed neighborhood development area, the applicant shall identify the resource, explain why the resource was included, describe any anticipated disturbance to such resource, and describe why the disturbance cannot be avoided or minimized.

Is served by planned or existing transportation infrastructure that conforms with “complete streets” principles as described under

19 V.S.A. § 309d

and establishes pedestrian access directly to the downtown, village center, or new town center.

Is compatible with and will reinforce the character of adjacent National Register Historic Districts, National or State Register Historic Sites, and other significant cultural and natural resources identified by local or State government.

The neighborhood development area is served by:

municipal sewer infrastructure; or

a community or alternative wastewater system approved by the Agency of Natural Resources.

The municipal bylaws allow minimum net residential densities within the neighborhood development area greater than or equal to four single-family detached dwelling units per acre, exclusive of accessory dwelling units, or no fewer than the average existing density of the surrounding neighborhood, whichever is greater. The methodology for calculating density shall be established in the guidelines developed by the Department pursuant to subsection 2792(d) of this title.

Regulations that adequately regulate the physical form and scale of development may be used to demonstrate compliance with this requirement.

Development in the neighborhood development areas that is lower than the minimum net residential density required by this subdivision (7) shall not qualify for the benefits stated in subsections (f) and (g) of this section. The district coordinator shall determine whether development meets this minimum net residential density requirement in accordance with subsection (f) of this section.

Local bylaws, regulations, and policies applicable to the neighborhood development area substantially conform with neighborhood design guidelines developed by the Department pursuant to section 2792 of this title. These policies shall:

ensure that all investments contribute to a built environment that enhances the existing neighborhood character and supports pedestrian use;

ensure sufficient residential density and building heights;

minimize the required lot sizes, setbacks, and parking and street widths; and

require conformance with “complete streets” principles as described under

19 V.S.A. § 309d

, street and pedestrian connectivity, and street trees.

Residents hold a right to utilize household energy conserving devices.

The application includes a map or maps that, at a minimum, identify:

“important natural resources” as defined in subdivision 2791(14) of this title;

existing slopes of 25 percent or steeper;

public facilities, including public buildings, public spaces, sewer or water services, roads, sidewalks, paths, transit, parking areas, parks, and schools;

planned public facilities, roads, or private development that is permitted but not built;

National Register Historic Districts, National or State Register Historic Sites, and other significant cultural and natural resources identified by local or State government;

designated downtown, village center, new town center, or growth center boundaries as approved under this chapter and their associated neighborhood planning area in accordance with this section; and

delineated areas of land appropriate for residential development and redevelopment under the requirements of this section.

The application includes the information and analysis required by the Department’s guidelines under section 2792 of this title.

Designation process. Within 45 days of receipt of a complete application for designation of a neighborhood development area, the State Board, after opportunity for public comment, shall approve a neighborhood development area if the Board determines that the applicant has met the requirements of this section.

When approving a neighborhood development area, the State Board shall consult with the applicant about any changes the Board considers making to the boundaries of the proposed area. After consultation with the applicant, the Board may change the boundaries of the proposed area.

A neighborhood development area may include one or more areas of land extending beyond the delineated neighborhood planning area, provided that at least 80 percent but no fewer than seven of the members of the State Board present find that:

including the extended area beyond the neighborhood planning area is consistent with the goals of section 4302 of this title;

residential development opportunities within the neighborhood planning area are limited due to natural constraints and existing development;

the extended area represents a logical extension of an existing compact settlement pattern and is consistent with smart growth principles; and

the extended area is adjacent to existing development.

Length of designation. Initial designation of a neighborhood development area shall be reviewed concurrently with the next periodic review conducted of the underlying designated downtown, village center, new town center, or growth center.

The State Board, on its motion, may review compliance with the designation requirements at more frequent intervals.

If the underlying downtown, village center, new town center, or growth center designation terminates, the neighborhood development area designation also shall terminate.

If at any time the State Board determines that the designated neighborhood development area no longer meets the standards for designation established in this section, it may take any of the following actions:

require corrective action within a reasonable time frame;

remove the neighborhood development area designation; or

prospectively limit benefits authorized in this chapter.

Action taken by the State Board under subdivision (3) of this subsection shall not affect benefits already received by the municipality or a land owner in the designated neighborhood development area.

Neighborhood development area incentives for developers. Once a municipality has a designated neighborhood development area or has a Vermont neighborhood designation pursuant to section 2793d of this title, any proposed development within that area shall be eligible for each of the benefits listed in this subsection. These benefits shall accrue upon approval by the district coordinator, who shall review the density requirements set forth in subdivision (c)(7) of this section to determine benefit eligibility and issue a jurisdictional opinion under 10 V.S.A. chapter 151 on whether the density requirements are met. These benefits are:

The application fee limit for wastewater applications stated in

3 V.S.A. § 2822(j)(4)(D)

.

The application fee reduction for residential development stated in

10 V.S.A. § 6083a(d)

.

The exclusion from the land gains tax provided by

32 V.S.A. § 10002(p)

.

Neighborhood development area incentives for municipalities. Once a municipality has a designated neighborhood development area, it may receive:

priority consideration for municipal planning grant funds; and

training and technical assistance from the Department to support an application for benefits from the Department.

Alternative designation. If a municipality has completed all of the planning and assessment steps of this section but has not requested designation of a neighborhood development area, an owner of land within a neighborhood planning area may apply to the State Board for neighborhood development area designation status for a portion of land within the neighborhood planning area. The applicant shall have the responsibility to demonstrate that all of the requirements for a neighborhood development area designation have been satisfied and to notify the municipality that the applicant is seeking the designation. The State Board shall provide the municipality with at least 14 days’ prior written notice of the Board’s meeting to consider the application, and the municipality shall submit to the State Board the municipality’s response, if any, to the application before or during that meeting. On approval of a neighborhood development area designation under this subsection, the applicant may proceed to obtain a jurisdictional opinion from the district coordinator under subsection (f) of this section in order to obtain the benefits granted to neighborhood development areas.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 59

, § 8.

§ 2794.
Incentives for program designees.

Upon designation by the Vermont Downtown Development Board under section 2793 of this title, a downtown development district and projects in a downtown development district shall be eligible for the following:

Priority consideration by any agency of the State administering any State or federal assistance program providing funding or other aid to a municipal downtown area with consideration given to such factors as the costs and benefits provided and the immediacy of those benefits, provided the project is eligible for the assistance program.

The following State tax credits:

A State historic rehabilitation tax credit of 10 percent under

32 V.S.A. § 5930cc(a)

that meets the requirements for the federal rehabilitation tax credit.

A State fagade improvement tax credit of 25 percent under

32 V.S.A. § 5930cc(b)

.

A State code improvement tax credit of 50 percent under

32 V.S.A. § 5930cc(c)

.

A planning grant, in an amount not to exceed $8,000.00 per site, for an initial site assessment of a suspected contaminated site, if the site otherwise qualifies under the community development block grant program in 10 V.S.A. chapter 29.

Financing of transportation projects under the State Infrastructure Bank, created under 10 V.S.A. chapter 12.

Assistance from the Secretary of Natural Resources for current owners and prospective purchasers who otherwise qualify under the Brownfield Property Cleanup Program set forth in 10 V.S.A. chapter 159, subchapter 3, or in the case of current owners, who are innocent owners. For the purposes of this subsection, an “innocent owner” is an owner who did not do any of the following:

Hold an ownership interest in the property or in any related fixtures or appurtenances, excluding a secured lender’s holding indicia of ownership in the property primarily to assure the repayment of a financial obligation at the time of any disposal of hazardous materials on the property.

Directly or indirectly cause or contribute to any releases or threatened releases of hazardous materials at the property.

Operate, or control the operation, at the property of a facility for the storage, treatment, or disposal of hazardous materials at the time of the disposal of hazardous materials at the property.

Dispose of, or arrange for the disposal of hazardous materials at the property.

Generate the hazardous materials that were disposed of at the property.

Technical assistance by the Department of Housing and Community Development with regard to planning and coordination issues, including adaptive reuse of buildings within the district, development of a marketing plan for the downtown district that includes a heritage tourism component, development of a program to encourage merchants and building owners to rehabilitate, restore, and improve building facades, and, in coordination with the Agency of Transportation, planning for multi-modal transportation needs of the community.

Hospitality training to be arranged by the Department of Tourism and Marketing.

Promotion of the downtown development district by the Department of Tourism and Marketing as part of the Department’s Integrated Marketing and Promotion Program.

Consistent with the Department’s available resources and subject to the Department’s priority for ensuring public safety, technical support from the Department of Public Safety for the rehabilitation of older and historic buildings.

A rebate of the cost of a qualified sprinkler system in an amount not to exceed $2,000.00 for building owners or lessees. Rebates shall be paid by the Department of Public Safety. To be qualified, a sprinkler system must be a complete automatic fire sprinkler system installed in accord with Department of Public Safety rules in an older or historic building that is certified for a State tax credit under

32 V.S.A. § 5930cc(a)

or (b) and is located in a downtown development district. A total of no more than $40,000.00 of rebates shall be granted in any calendar year by the Department. If in any year applications for rebates exceed this amount, the Department shall grant rebates for qualified systems according to the date the building was certified for a State tax credit under 32 V.S.A. § 5930cc(a) or (b) with the earlier date receiving priority.

Participation in the Downtown Transportation and Related Capital Improvement Fund Program established by section 2796 of this title.

Priority for locating proposed State functions by the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services or other State officials, in consultation with the legislative body of a municipality and based on the suitability of the State function to a downtown location.

A reallocation of receipts related to the tax imposed on sales of construction materials as provided in

32 V.S.A. § 9819

.

The authority to create a special taxing district pursuant to chapter 87 of this title for the purpose of financing both capital and operating costs of a project within the boundaries of a downtown development district.

Prior to designation of a downtown as a downtown development district by the Vermont Downtown Development Board under section 2793 of this title, the Board may deem eligible any otherwise qualified owners or lessees of buildings within a downtown for the tax credits under 32 V.S.A. chapter 151, subchapter 11J if the Board finds that the legislative body of the municipality in which the property is located is intending to seek designation of the downtown as a downtown development district and has taken substantial actions and made substantial commitments in furtherance of that intent.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2001, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 28, 2002;

2005, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 2795.
Considerations for competitive-based incentives.

In awarding competitive-based financial incentives under section 2794 of this title, including a rebate and tax incentives, or in awarding grants or other assistance from the Downtown Transportation and Related Capital Improvement Fund under section 2796 of this title, the Vermont Downtown Development Board shall give consideration to the following factors:

the vacancy rate for existing buildings in the downtown district;

the current or projected unemployment rate for the labor market area in which the municipality is located;

ordinances or bylaws adopted by the municipality that support the preservation of the downtown’s vitality, including:

an ordinance or bylaw requiring that new construction in the downtown development district shall be compatible with the buildings that contribute to the integrity of the district, in terms of materials, features, size, scale and proportion, and massing of buildings, and that exterior rehabilitation shall respect the historic and architectural significance and its exterior features; and

a conditional use provision in a town zoning ordinance that supports adaptive reuse of historic properties;

the integration of the proposed improvements with any coordinated plan for the downtown district and surrounding area;

the degree of any deficiency in the downtown district of transportation infrastructure including parking facilities;

the vulnerability of the downtown district to economic decline due to competing development in adjacent areas;

the immediacy of the benefits provided and the desirability of prompt action to secure those benefits for a downtown district;

the amount of investment from individual Vermont taxpayers that has been committed to projects in the downtown district. In considering this factor, the Board shall recognize the value of individuals participating in downtown projects by giving preference to applications for incentives from individual Vermont taxpayers, and projects coordinated by developers who have encouraged the participation of such investors.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1999, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 33.

§ 2796.
Downtown Transportation and Related Capital Improvement Fund.

There is created a Downtown Transportation and Related Capital Improvement Fund, to be also known as the Fund, which shall be a special fund created under 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5, to be administered by the Vermont Downtown Development Board in accordance with this chapter to aid municipalities with designated downtown districts in financing capital transportation and related improvement projects to support economic development.

The Fund shall be comprised of the following:

such State or federal funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly;

any gifts, grants, or other contributions to the Fund;

proceeds from the issuance of general obligation bonds.

Any municipality with a designated downtown development district may apply to the Vermont Downtown Development Board for financial assistance from the Fund for capital transportation and related improvement projects within or serving the district. The Board may award to any municipality grants in amounts not to exceed $250,000.00 annually, loans, or loan guarantees for financing capital transportation projects, including construction or alteration of roads and highways, parking facilities, and rail or bus facilities or equipment, or for the underground relocation of electric utility, cable, and telecommunications lines, but shall not include assistance for operating costs. Grants awarded by the Board shall not exceed 80 percent of the overall cost of the project. The approval of the Board may be conditioned upon the repayment to the Fund of some or all of the amount of a loan or other financial benefits and such repayment may be from local taxes, fees, or other local revenues sources. The Board shall consider geographical distribution in awarding the resources of the Fund.

The Fund shall be available to the Department of Housing and Community Development for the reasonable and necessary costs of administering the Fund. The amount projected to be spent on administration shall be included in the Department’s fiscal year budget presentations to the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 120

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2003, No. 66

, § 237b;

2005, No. 6

, § 64, eff. March 26, 2005;

2015, No. 58

, § E.805.

§ 2797.
Property Assessment Fund; brownfields and redevelopment; competitive program.

There is created a Property Assessment Fund pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5 to be administered by the Department of Housing and Community Development for the purpose of providing financing, on a competitive basis, to municipalities that demonstrate a financial need in order to determine and evaluate a full assessment of the extent and the cost of remediation of property, or in the case of an existing building, an assessment that supports a clear plan, including the associated costs of renovation to bring the building into compliance with State and local building codes.

The Fund shall be composed of the following:

State or federal funds that may be appropriated by the General Assembly.

Any gifts, grants, or other contributions to the funds.

Proceeds from the issuance of general obligation bonds.

A municipality deemed financially eligible may apply to the fund for the assessment of property and existing buildings proposed for redevelopment, provided the Department finds that the property or building:

is not likely to be renovated or improved without the preliminary assessment;

when renovated or redeveloped, will integrate and be compatible with any applicable and approved regional development, capital, and municipal plans; is expected to create new property tax if developed by a taxable entity; and is expected to reduce pressure for development on open or undeveloped land in the local community or in the region.

The Department shall distribute funds under this section in a manner that provides funding for assessment projects of various sizes in as many geographical areas of the State as possible and may require matching funds from the municipality in which an assessment project is conducted.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 49, eff. June 8, 2004.

§ 2798.
Designation decisions; nonappeal.

The designation decisions of the State Board under this chapter are not subject to appeal.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 59

, § 9.

§ 2799. Section 2799 repealed effective July 1, 2024. Better Places Program; crowd granting.

There is created the Better Places Program within the Department of Housing and Community Development, and the Better Places Fund, which the Department shall manage pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5.
(a) (1) There is created the Better Places Program within the Department of Housing and Community Development, and the Better Places Fund, which the Department shall manage pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5.

The purpose of the Program is to utilize crowdfunding to spark community revitalization through collaborative grantmaking for projects that create, activate, or revitalize public spaces.

The Department may administer the Program in coordination with and support from other State agencies and nonprofit and philanthropic partners.

The Fund is composed of the following:

State or federal funds appropriated by the General Assembly;

gifts, grants, or other contributions to the Fund; and

any interest earned by the Fund.

As used in this section, “public space” means an area or place that is open and accessible to all people with no charge for admission and includes village greens, squares, parks, community centers, town halls, libraries, and other publicly accessible buildings and connecting spaces such as sidewalks, streets, alleys, and trails.

The Department of Housing and Community Development shall establish an application process, eligibility criteria, and criteria for prioritizing assistance for awarding grants through the Program.
(d) (1) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall establish an application process, eligibility criteria, and criteria for prioritizing assistance for awarding grants through the Program.

The Department may award a grant to a municipality, a nonprofit organization, or a community group with a fiscal sponsor for a project that is located in or serves a designated downtown, village center, new town center, or neighborhood development area that will create a new public space or revitalize or activate an existing public space.

The Department may award a grant to not more than one project per calendar year within a municipality.

The minimum amount of a grant award is $5,000.00, and the maximum amount of a grant award is $40,000.00.

The Department shall develop matching grant eligibility requirements to ensure a broad base of community and financial support for the project, subject to the following:

A project shall include in-kind support and matching funds raised through a crowdfunding approach that includes multiple donors.

An applicant may not donate to its own crowdfunding campaign.

A donor may not contribute more than $10,000.00 or 35 percent of the campaign goal, whichever is less.

An applicant shall provide matching funds raised through crowdfunding of not less than 33 percent of the grant award.

The Department of Housing and Community Development, with the assistance of a fiscal agent, shall distribute funds under this section in a manner that provides funding for projects of various sizes in as many geographical areas of the State as possible.

The Department of Housing and Community Development may use up to 15 percent of any appropriation to the Fund from the General Fund to assist with crowdfunding, administration, training, and technological needs of the Program.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 74

, § H.6; repealed on July 1, 2024 by

2021, No. 74

, § H.8.